California statutes. Education Code
(b) If the member is employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program at the time the disability allowance is approved under this part, the member shall notify the system in writing, within 90 days, of the last day on which the member will perform service. If the member does not respond within 90 days, or if the last day on which service will be performed is more than 90 days after the date the system notifies the member of approval of the disability allowance, the member’s application for a disability allowance shall be rejected and a disability allowance shall not be payable to the member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 26.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

24006.

Upon qualification for disability under this part, a member shall receive an annual allowance equal to 50 percent of final compensation payable in monthly installments. The allowance shall be increased by 10 percent of final compensation for each dependent child, to a maximum of four dependent children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 151.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24007.

A member who qualifies for a disability allowance under this chapter and who has attained age 45 years, but who has not yet attained age 60 years, shall have his or her allowance calculated upon service with each year of credited California service providing 5 percent of final compensation. The disabled member shall receive the lesser of this amount or the amount provided by Section 24006. A child’s portion of the allowance shall be determined pursuant to Section 24006. This section shall not apply to a member who is eligible to apply for a disability allowance under subdivision (c) of Section 24001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 386, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24009.

A disability allowance payable pursuant to Sections 24006 and 24007 that includes a child’s portion shall be reduced when a dependent child becomes ineligible. The reduction shall take into account the increases made by application of the improvement factor. However, the member’s disability allowance shall not be less than it would have been if there had never been a dependent child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1165, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24010.

Allowances payable under Sections 24006 and 24007 shall be reduced by an amount equal to the unmodified benefits paid or payable under other public systems for the same impairment or impairments that qualify the member for a disability allowance under this part. With respect to workers’ compensation payments that are subject to liens under Section 4903 of the Labor Code, “unmodified benefits,” for purposes of this section, shall only include payments for temporary disability, vocational rehabilitation monthly allowance, and permanent disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 375, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

24011.

A member who qualifies for disability allowance pursuant to this chapter because of a disabling impairment that is amenable to treatment that could be expected to restore the member’s ability to perform service in the member’s former position of employment or a comparable level position shall participate in a treatment program prescribed by the member’s primary treating physician. Willful failure to initiate and continue participation in the treatment program shall cause the disability allowance to be terminated. In determining whether a member has good cause for failure to follow the treatment program, the board shall take into account whether treatment would abridge the member’s right to the free exercise of religion or whether the member’s physical or mental condition has worsened, as determined by the member’s treating physician and substantiated by medical evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 153.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24012.

(a) A member who is receiving a disability allowance pursuant to this chapter who is determined by the board to have a mental, physical, or vocational rehabilitation potential that could be expected to restore the member’s ability to perform service in the member’s former position of employment or a comparable level position shall participate in an appropriate rehabilitation program approved by the board. The board shall pay all reasonable costs of the approved program. Willful failure to initiate and continue participation in the rehabilitation program shall cause the disability allowance to be terminated. In determining whether a member has good cause for failure to participate in the program, the board shall take into account whether the participation would abridge the member’s right to the free exercise of religion or whether the member’s physical or mental condition has worsened, as determined by the member’s treating physician and substantiated by medical evidence.

(b) Any cost for the approved rehabilitation program prescribed by the board shall be paid directly by the system from the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 859, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

24013.

The board may require any member receiving a disability allowance under this part to undergo medical examination at such times as the board deems necessary. The system may request the member’s treating physician, upon authorization by the disabled member, to complete a medical reevaluation questionnaire. The system shall reimburse the disabled member for all reasonable costs related to completion of this questionnaire in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if the disabled member has no other health coverage that would pay the costs of completing the medical questionnaire. The board may authorize a medical examination to be conducted by the disabled member’s treating source at the disabled member’s expense and, in any case, may require a medical examination to be conducted by a physician selected by the board, in which event, the board shall pay all reasonable costs associated with the examination. The board shall, in scheduling medical examinations, give consideration to the interests and convenience of the disabled member. If the examination, together with other available information, shows to the satisfaction of the board that the member is no longer disabled, the disability allowance shall be terminated. Should the disabled member refuse to submit to medical examination, as provided in this section, the disability allowance shall be terminated and all rights of the disabled member to the disability allowance shall be revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24014.

A disabled member may be employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program. The employment shall not cause the disability allowance to be suspended or terminated except as provided in Sections 23401, 24013, and 24015, and no deduction shall be made from the disabled member’s compensation as contributions to the Defined Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 155.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24015.

Notwithstanding Section 22132, if a person who begins to receive a disability allowance under this part after June 30, 1972, is employed, or is self-employed in any capacity in which his or her average earnings for any prior continuous six months amount to 66 23 percent of the indexed final compensation, the person shall be presumed capable of performing gainful employment and no longer disabled. The disability allowance shall be terminated on the first day of the month following the six-month period. Any allowance paid thereafter shall be considered an overpayment and recovery shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 156.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24016.

(a) For any one or more months in which the total of a disabled member’s allowance under this part, excluding children’s portions, and earnings exceed 100 percent of indexed final compensation, 100 percent of the amount in excess shall be considered an overpayment and recovery shall be made.

(b) This action shall not apply to disabled members who have allowances terminated under Section 24015 or who are enrolled in an approved rehabilitation program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 157.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24017.

If a person who began receiving a disability allowance under this part after June 30, 1972, is enrolled in an approved rehabilitation program and the total of the disability allowance, excluding children’s portions, and earnings exceed 100 percent of indexed final compensation, 50 percent of the amount in excess shall be considered an overpayment and recovery shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 158.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24018.

When a disabled member returns to work in his or her former position of employment or in a comparable level position and within six months of return experiences a recurrence of the original disability, that can be medically substantiated, it shall be considered, for the purpose of determining the duration of the disability, that the condition had its onset as of the date the member first became disabled. The former disability allowance under this part shall again become payable as of the later of the first day of the month in which the recurrence of the disability occurred or the last day of creditable service for which compensation is payable to the member provided the member complies with the provisions of Section 24003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 207, Sec. 16.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 26. Disability Retirement [24100. - 24119.]

24100.

This chapter governs the eligibility, allowance computations, and related provisions for the disability retirement program. This chapter applies to all persons who become members of the plan under this part on and after October 16, 1992, all persons who become members of the plan on and after October 16, 1992, subsequent to a refund, and to all members as of October 15, 1992, who elect under this part, pursuant to Chapter 21.5 (commencing with Section 23700), to be covered by the disability retirement program set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 160.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24101.

A member may apply for a disability retirement under this part upon written application for disability retirement to the board on a properly executed form provided by the system and subject to the following:

(a) The member has five or more years of credited service and all of the following requirements are met:

(1) At least four years were credited for actual service performed subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program. Credit received because of workers’ compensation payments shall be counted toward the four-year requirement in accordance with Section 22710.

(2) The last five years of credited service were performed in this state.

(3) Except as described in subdivision (d) of Section 24201.5, the member is not currently receiving a service retirement allowance and at least one year of credited service was earned subsequent to the date on which the member terminated a service retirement allowance under Section 24208.

(4) At least one year of credited service was earned subsequent to the date on which the member’s disability retirement was terminated.

(5) At least one year of credited service was earned subsequent to the most recent refund of accumulated retirement contributions.

(6) The member is not
 applying for a disability retirement because of a physical or mental condition known to exist at the time the most recent membership in the Defined Benefit Program commenced and that remains substantially unchanged at the time of application.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall affect the right of a member to a disability retirement if the reason that the member has performed less than four years of actual service is due to an on-the-job injury or a disease while in employment subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program and the four-year requirement can be satisfied by credit obtained under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 22850) in addition to any credit received from workers’ compensation payments.

(c) Nothing
 in subdivision (a) shall affect the right of a member under this part who has less than five years of credited service to a disability retirement allowance if the following conditions are met:

(1) The member has at least one year of credited service performed in this state.

(2) The disability is a direct result of an unlawful act of bodily injury that was perpetrated on his or her person by another human being while the member was performing his or her official duties in a position subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program.

(3) The member provides documentation of the unlawful act in the form of an official police report or official employer incident report.

(d) A member who is eligible to apply for a disability retirement pursuant to this section may also apply for a service retirement pending a determination of his or her application for disability as described in Section 24201.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 15.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24101.5.

A member shall not be eligible for disability retirement under the Defined Benefit Program while on a leave of absence to serve as a full-time, elected officer of an employee organization, even if the member receives service credit under Section 22711.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

24102.

(a) The board may authorize payment of a disability retirement allowance under this part to any member who is qualified upon application by the member, the member’s guardian or conservator, or the member’s employer, if the application is submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system during any one of the following periods:

(1) While the member is employed and has performed creditable service within the four months previous to application, or while the member is on a compensated leave of absence.

(2) While the member is physically or mentally incapacitated for performance of service and the incapacity has been continuous from the last day of
 actual performance of service for which compensation is payable to the member.

(3) While the member is on a leave of absence without compensation, granted for reason other than mental or physical incapacity for performance of service, and within four months after the last day of actual performance of service for which compensation is payable to the member, or within 12 months of that date if the member was on an employer-approved leave to study at an approved college or university.

(4) Within four months after the termination of the member’s employment subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program, if the application was not made under paragraph (2) and was not made more than four months after the last day of actual performance of service for which compensation is payable to the member.

(b) The member is not
 qualified to receive a disability retirement allowance if the member is applying because of a physical or mental condition that existed at the time the most recent membership in the Defined Benefit Program commenced and which remains substantially unchanged at the time of application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 21.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24103.

(a) The member shall provide medical documentation substantiating the impairment qualifying the member for the disability retirement under this part.

(b) On receipt of an application for disability retirement under this part, the system may order a medical examination or review of medical documentation of a member to determine whether the member is incapacitated for performance of service. The medical examination or review of medical documentation shall be conducted by a practicing physician, selected by the board, with expertise in the member’s impairment, and the board shall pay all costs associated with the examination or review of medical documentation. If the member refuses to submit to the required medical examination or review of medical documentation, the
 application for disability retirement shall be rejected. If a medical examination is ordered:

(1) The member shall either remain in this state, or return to this state at the member’s own expense, to undergo the medical examination or the application shall be rejected, unless this requirement is waived by the board. The board shall pay all other reasonable costs related to travel and meals in accordance with the rates set for state employees by the Department of Human Resources.

(2) If the member is too ill to be examined, the system shall postpone the examination until the member can be examined. The member or the member’s treating physician shall inform the system, in writing, when the medical examination can be rescheduled.

(c) The system may reject the disability retirement application under this part if the
 member fails to provide requested medical documentation to substantiate a disability, as defined in Section 22126, within 45 days from the date of the request or within 30 days from the time that a legally designated representative is empowered to act on behalf of a member who is mentally or physically incapacitated.

(d) If the board determines that a member who has applied for disability retirement under this part may perform service in the member’s former position of employment or in a comparable level position with the assistance of reasonable accommodation, the board may require the member to request reasonable accommodation from the employer. Failure of the member to request reasonable accommodation, as directed by the board, may be grounds for cancellation of the disability retirement application under this part.

(e) If the employer fails or refuses to provide reasonable
 accommodation, the board may require the member to pursue an administrative appeal of the employer’s denial as a condition for receiving a disability retirement allowance under this part.

(f) The system shall inform the member of the rejection or cancellation of the member’s disability retirement allowance application under this part within 30 days after that determination is made by the system.

(g) In determining whether a member meets the definition of disability pursuant to Section 22126, the board shall make a determination on the basis of competent medical documentation and shall not use the awarding of a disability retirement as a substitute for the disciplinary process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 9.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

24104.

In cases of a member’s willful substance abuse or if the board determines a member who qualifies for disability retirement under this part pursuant to this chapter has mental, physical, or vocational rehabilitation potential, the board may limit the disability retirement to a period not to exceed two years from the date of approval of the disability retirement. Notwithstanding Section 24112, the disability retirement allowance shall terminate at the end of the period granted unless an extension is granted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 165.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24105.

(a) A disability retirement allowance under this part shall become effective upon any date designated by the member, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) An application for disability retirement is filed on a properly executed form prescribed by the system.

(2) The effective date is later than the last day the member earned creditable compensation pursuant to Section 22119.2 or 22119.3.

(3) The effective date is no earlier than either the first day of the month in which the application is received at the system’s headquarters office or the date upon and continuously after
 which the member is determined to the satisfaction of the board to have been mentally incompetent.

(4) The application for disability retirement contains an election of either an unmodified allowance or an allowance modified under an option as provided in Section 24332.

(b) If the member is employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program at the time the disability retirement is approved, the member shall notify the system in writing, within 90 days, of the last day on which the member will perform service. If the member does not respond within 90 days, or if the last day on which service will be performed is more than 90 days after the date the system notifies the member of the approval of disability retirement, the member’s application for disability retirement shall be rejected and a disability retirement allowance shall not be
 payable to the member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 27.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

24106.

Upon retirement for disability pursuant to this chapter, a member under this part shall receive a retirement allowance that shall consist of all of the following:

(a) An annual allowance equal to 50 percent of final compensation payable in monthly installments.

(b) An additional 10 percent of final compensation for each dependent child, up to a maximum of 40 percent of final compensation. If there are more than four dependent children, they shall share equally in the maximum allowance of 40 percent. A dependent child may waive his or her right to his or her portion of the allowance in accordance with
 procedures established by the system. The waiver shall be submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system. All waiver forms for an ongoing benefit shall include an acknowledgment on the part of the waiving beneficiary that the benefit being waived is an ongoing benefit, which may exceed the total amount of contributions and interest payable from the member’s account as a result of the waiver. The filing of a waiver by a beneficiary constitutes a complete and immediate discharge of all obligations of the board, the system, or the plan to or on behalf of the beneficiary.

(c) An annuity that shall be the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated annuity deposit contributions standing to the credit of the member’s account on the effective date of the disability retirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 11.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

24107.

A member retired for disability under this part may elect an option pursuant to Section 24332 to modify the disability retirement allowance payable pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 24106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 29.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24108.

A retirement allowance payable pursuant to Section 24106 that includes a child’s portion shall be reduced when a dependent child becomes ineligible. The reduction shall take into account the increases made by application of the improvement factor. However, the retired member’s allowance under this part shall not be less than it could have been if there had never been a dependent child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24109.

Retirement allowances payable pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 24106 shall be reduced by an amount equal to the unmodified benefits paid or payable under a workers’ compensation program for the same impairment or impairments that qualify the member for a disability retirement allowance under this part. For purposes of this section, unmodified benefits are limited to benefits for temporary disability, permanent disability, and for vocational rehabilitation paid or payable under the Workers’ Compensation Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 864, Sec. 12.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

24110.

A member who qualifies for disability retirement under this part pursuant to this chapter because of a disabling impairment that is amenable to treatment that could be expected to restore the member’s ability to perform service in the member’s former position of employment or in a comparable level position shall participate in a treatment program prescribed by the member’s primary treating physician. Willful failure to initiate and continue participation in the program shall cause the disability retirement allowance to be terminated. In determining whether a member has good cause for failure to follow that treatment, the board shall take into account whether the treatment would abridge the member’s right to the free exercise of religion or whether the member’s physical or mental condition has worsened as determined by the member’s treating physician and substantiated by medical evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 171.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24111.

(a) A member who is receiving a disability retirement allowance under this part pursuant to this chapter who is determined by the board to have a mental, physical, or vocational rehabilitation potential that could be expected to restore the member’s ability to perform service in the member’s former position of employment or in a comparable level position shall participate in an appropriate rehabilitation program approved by the board. The board shall pay all reasonable costs of the approved program. Willful failure to initiate and continue participation in the rehabilitation program shall cause the disability retirement allowance under this part to be terminated. In determining whether a member has good cause for failure to participate in the program, the board shall take into account whether the participation would abridge the member’s right to the free exercise of religion or whether the member’s physical or mental condition has worsened as determined by the member’s treating physician and substantiated by medical evidence.

(b) Any cost for the approved rehabilitation program prescribed by the board shall be paid directly by the system from the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 859, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

24112.

The board may require a member receiving a disability retirement allowance under this part to undergo medical examination at such times as the board deems necessary. The system may request the member’s treating physician, upon authorization by the retired member, to complete a medical reevaluation questionnaire. The system shall reimburse the retired member for all reasonable costs related to completion of this questionnaire in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if the retired member has no other health coverage that would pay for the cost of completing the medical questionnaire. The board may authorize a medical examination to be conducted by the retired member’s treating source at the retired member’s expense and, in any case, may require a medical examination to be conducted by a physician selected by the board, in which event, the board shall pay all reasonable costs associated with the examination. The board shall, in scheduling medical examinations, give consideration to the interests and convenience of the retired member. If the examination, together with other available information, shows to the satisfaction of the board that the retired member is no longer disabled, the disability retirement allowance shall be terminated. Should the retired member refuse to submit to medical examination, as provided in this section, the member’s disability retirement allowance shall be terminated and all rights of the retired member to the disability retirement allowance shall be revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24113.

A member retired for disability under this part may be employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program. The employment shall not cause the disability retirement allowance to be suspended or terminated, except as provided in Section 24112, and no deduction shall be made from the retired member’s compensation as contributions to the plan under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 174.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24114.

(a) A member receiving a disability retirement benefit under this part may be employed or self-employed in any capacity, notwithstanding Section 22132, but may not make contributions to the retirement fund with respect to the Defined Benefit Program or accrue service credit under this part based on earnings from any employment.

(b) A member receiving a disability retirement benefit under this part may earn in any one calendar year up to the limitation specified in subdivision (c) without a reduction in his or her disability retirement allowance.

(c) The limitation that shall apply to the earnings of a member receiving a disability retirement benefit under this
 part shall be fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), in any one calendar year, adjusted annually by the board effective each January 1 by the amount of increase in the All Urban California Consumer Price Index using December 1989 as the base.

(d) If a member receiving a disability retirement benefit under this part earns in excess of the limitation specified in subdivision (c) from all employment in any calendar year, notwithstanding Section 22132, his or her retirement allowance shall be reduced by the amount of the excess earnings. The amount of the reduction in an individual month shall be no more than the monthly allowance payable in that month, and the total amount of the reduction shall not exceed the amount of the annual allowance payable under this part for the calendar year in which the excess compensation was earned.

(e) The earnings limitation specified in this section
 does not apply to a member receiving a disability retirement benefit under this part who is participating in an approved rehabilitation program pursuant to Section 24111.

(f) This section does not apply to a member receiving a disability retirement benefit under this part who began receiving a disability retirement allowance prior to October 16, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 17.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

24116.

A member retired for disability under this part whose last employment was in the California State University, as a member of the Defined Benefit Program or the Public Employees’ Retirement System, may serve as a member of the teaching staff of the California State University and shall be subject to the employment limitations as provided by the Public Employees’ Retirement Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 176.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24117.

(a) A member retired for disability under this part may terminate the disability retirement allowance upon written request to the system.

(b) If a member retired for disability under this part is determined by the board to no longer be eligible to receive a disability retirement allowance pursuant to this chapter, the disability retirement allowance shall be terminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 177.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24118.

(a) Upon termination of a disability retirement allowance that was payable pursuant to this chapter, the individual account of the member under this part shall be credited with the amount of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions as they were on the effective date of disability retirement, less the sum of all payments made under subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 24106. The reduction shall not be greater than the total of the accumulated retirement contributions.

(b) Upon the termination of a disability retirement, the accumulated annuity deposit contribution account of the member shall be credited with the amounts of those contributions as they were on the date the annuity became payable under this part because of that retirement less the sum of all payments made pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 24106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 178.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24119.

When a member retired for disability under this part returns to work in the member’s former position of employment or in a comparable level position and within six months of return experiences a recurrence of the original disability, which can be medically substantiated, it shall be considered, for the purpose of determining the duration of the disability, that the condition had its onset as of the date the member first became disabled. The former disability retirement allowance shall again become payable as of the later of the first day of the month in which the recurrence of the disability occurred or the last day of creditable service for which compensation is payable to the member, provided the member complies with Section
 24103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 207, Sec. 19.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 27. Service Retirement [24201. - 24221.]

24201.

(a) A member may retire for service under this part upon written application for retirement to the board on a properly executed form provided by the system, under paragraph (1) or (2) as follows:

(1) The member has attained 55 years of age or more and has at least five years of credited service, at least one year of which has been performed subsequent to the most recent refund of accumulated retirement contributions. The five years of credited service may include out-of-state
 service purchased pursuant to Section 22820. The number of years of credited service performed in California shall not be less than the number of years necessary to determine final compensation pursuant to Section 22134 or 22135, whichever is applicable to the member.

(2) The member is credited with service that is not used as a basis for benefits under any other public retirement system, excluding the federal social security system, if the member has attained 55 years of age or older and retires concurrently under one or more of the retirement systems with which the member has concurrent membership as defined in Section 22115.2.

(b) Application for retirement under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be made even if the member has not earned five years of credited service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

24201.5.

(a) A member who is eligible and applies for a disability allowance or retirement pursuant to Section 24001 or 24101 may apply to receive a service retirement allowance pending the determination of their application for disability, subject to all of the following:

(1) The member is eligible to retire for service under Section 24201 or 24203.

(2) The member submits the application on a form provided by the system, subject to all of the following:

(A) The application is executed no earlier than the date the application for disability benefits
 is executed and no earlier than six months before the effective date of the retirement allowance.

(B) The effective date is no earlier than the first day of the month in which the application for disability benefits is received by the system, unless the application for disability benefits is denied or canceled and the member has indicated an earlier service retirement date on the application to use if denied or canceled. If the application for disability benefits is denied or canceled, the service retirement date of a member who submits an application for retirement pursuant to this section shall be no earlier than 270 calendar days prior to when the application for service
 retirement is received by the system.

(C) The effective date is later than the last day the member earned creditable compensation pursuant to Section 22119.2 or 22119.3.

(D) The effective date is no earlier than one year following the date on which a retirement allowance was terminated pursuant to Section 24208, unless the application for disability benefits is denied or canceled and the member has indicated an earlier service retirement date on the application to use if denied or canceled. If the application for disability benefits is denied or canceled, the service retirement date is no earlier than one day after the date on which a retirement allowance was terminated pursuant to Section 24208, provided that the retirement allowance is terminated no earlier than
 270 calendar days prior to when the application for service retirement is received by the system.

(E) The effective date is no earlier than one year following the date on which a retirement allowance was terminated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 24117.

(3) The effective date of the service retirement allowance can be no earlier than the date upon and continuously after which the member is determined to the satisfaction of the board to have been mentally incompetent.

(4) A member who applies for service retirement under this section is not eligible to receive a lump-sum payment and an actuarially reduced monthly allowance pursuant to Section 24221.

(5) A member who applies for service retirement under this section is not eligible to receive an allowance calculated pursuant to Section 24205.

(6) A member who applies for service retirement under this section and elects to receive their retirement benefit pursuant to Section 25009 as a lump-sum payment is not eligible to elect a disability benefit pursuant to Section 25016 or 25018.1.

(7) (A) Except as described in subparagraph (B), a member who applies for service retirement under this section shall not receive service credit for each day of accumulated and unused leave of absence for illness or injury or for education pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5.

(B) If the application for disability is denied or canceled, the member’s service retirement allowance shall be adjusted to the effective date of the service retirement to include service credited pursuant to Section 22717 or 22717.5.
